Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-10,126.01
Class V school district; school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2017-18; school tax; additional levy; funds established.

For school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2017-18, each Class V school district shall establish (1) for the general operation of the schools, such fund as will result from distributions pursuant to section 79-1073 from the learning community levy and any annual levy of such rate of tax upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such school district as the board of education determines to be necessary for such purpose and as authorized pursuant to subdivision (2)(c) of section 77-3442, (2) for the purpose of acquiring sites of school buildings and the erection, alteration, equipping, and furnishing of school buildings and additions to school buildings, a fund as will result from distributions from any annual levy of such rate of tax upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such school district as the school board determines to be necessary for such purpose and as authorized pursuant to subdivision (2)(c) of section 77-3442, which fund shall be used for no other purposes, and (3) a further fund resulting from an annual amount of tax to be determined by the board of education to pay interest on and for retiring, funding, or servicing of bonded indebtedness of the district.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 102;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 32;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 55.